Florida, session 2026, SB1152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSection 316.305, Florida Statutes, is amended to 22 read: 23 316.305âWireless communications devices; use in a handheld 24 manner prohibited prohibition.â 25 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida Hands-Free 26 Ban on Texting While Driving Law.â 27 (2)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to: 28 (a)âImprove roadway safety for all vehicle operators, 29 vehicle passengers, bicyclists, pedestrians, and other road 30 users. 31 (b)âPrevent crashes related to the use of a wireless 32 communications device in a handheld manner act of text messaging 33 while driving a motor vehicle. 34 (c)âReduce injuries, deaths, property damage, health care 35 costs, health insurance rates, and automobile insurance rates 36 related to motor vehicle crashes. 37 (d)âAuthorize law enforcement officers to stop motor 38 vehicles and issue citations to persons who are using wireless 39 communications devices in a handheld manner texting while 40 driving. 41 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 42 (a)ââHandheld mannerâ means holding a wireless 43 communications device in one or both hands or physically 44 supporting the device with any other part of the body. 45 (b)ââHands-free accessoryâ means an attachment to or a 46 built-in feature of a wireless communications device which 47 allows the operator of a motor vehicle to engage in 48 interpersonal communication or otherwise use such device other 49 than in a handheld manner. 50 (c)ââWireless communications deviceâ: 51 1.âMeans a handheld device used or capable of being used in 52 a handheld manner to: 53 a.âTransmit or receive a voice message; initiate, receive, 54 or maintain a telephone call; or otherwise engage in 55 interpersonal voice communication; 56 b.âReceive or transmit text-based or character-based 57 messages or otherwise engage in interpersonal nonvoice 58 communication; 59 c.âRecord or display videos or images; 60 d.âEnter, access, or store data; or 61 e.âConnect to the Internet or any communications service as 62 defined in s. 812.15(1). 63 2.âIncludes, but is not limited to, a cellular telephone, a 64 smartphone, a tablet computer, a laptop computer, a two-way 65 messaging device, an electronic gaming device, or a device 66 capable of displaying videos or images. The term does not 67 include a citizens band radio, a citizens band radio hybrid, a 68 commercial two-way radio communications device or its functional 69 equivalent, a subscription-based emergency communications 70 device, a prescribed medical device, an amateur or ham radio 71 device, or an in-vehicle security, navigation, communications, 72 or remote diagnostics system. 73 (4)(a)(3)(a)âA person may not operate a motor vehicle while 74 using manually typing or entering multiple letters, numbers, 75 symbols, or other characters into a wireless communications 76 device in a handheld manner except to activate, deactivate, 77 initiate, or terminate a feature or function of the device, 78 including a hands-free accessory. Sustained use of a wireless 79 communications device by a person operating a motor vehicle must 80 be conducted through a hands-free accessory until such use is 81 terminated. or while sending or reading data on such a device 82 for the purpose of nonvoice interpersonal communication, 83 including, but not limited to, communication methods known as 84 texting, e-mailing, and instant messaging. As used in this 85 section, the term âwireless communications deviceâ means any 86 handheld device used or capable of being used in a handheld 87 manner, that is designed or intended to receive or transmit text 88 or character-based messages, access or store data, or connect to 89 the Internet or any communications service as defined in s. 90 812.15 and that allows text communications. For the purposes of 91 this paragraph, A motor vehicle that is stationary is not being 92 operated and is not subject to the prohibition in this 93 paragraph. 94 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to a motor vehicle 95 operator who is: 96 1.âPerforming official duties as an operator of an 97 authorized emergency vehicle as defined in s. 322.01, a law 98 enforcement or fire service professional, or an emergency 99 medical services professional. 100 2.âReporting an emergency or criminal or suspicious 101 activity to law enforcement authorities. 102 3.âReceiving messages that are: 103 a.âRelated to the operation or navigation of the motor 104 vehicle; 105 b.âSafety-related information, including emergency, 106 traffic, or weather alerts; 107 c.âData used primarily by the motor vehicle; or 108 d.âRadio broadcasts. 109 4.âUsing a device or system for navigation purposes. 110 5.âConducting wireless interpersonal communication that 111 does not require manual entry of multiple letters, numbers, or 112 symbols, except to activate, deactivate, or initiate a feature 113 or function. 114 6.âConducting wireless interpersonal communication that 115 does not require reading text messages, except to activate, 116 deactivate, or initiate a feature or function. 117 7.âOperating an autonomous vehicle, as defined in s. 118 316.003(3), with the automated driving system engaged. 119 (c)âA law enforcement officer who stops a motor vehicle for 120 a violation of paragraph (a) must inform the motor vehicle 121 operator of his or her right to decline a search of his or her 122 wireless communications device and may not: 123 1.âAccess the wireless communications device without a 124 warrant. 125 2.âConfiscate the wireless communications device while 126 awaiting issuance of a warrant to access such device. 127 3.âObtain consent from the motor vehicle operator to search 128 his or her wireless communications device through coercion or 129 other improper method. Consent to search a motor vehicle 130 operatorâs wireless communications device must be voluntary and 131 unequivocal. 132 (d)âOnly in the event of a crash resulting in death or 133 personal injury, a userâs billing records for a wireless 134 communications device or the testimony of or written statements 135 from appropriate authorities receiving such messages may be 136 admissible as evidence in any proceeding to determine whether a 137 violation of paragraph (a) has been committed. 138 (5)(a)(4)(a)âA Any person who violates paragraph (4)(a) 139 (3)(a) commits a noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable as a 140 nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 141 (b)âA Any person who commits a second or subsequent 142 violation of paragraph (4)(a) (3)(a) within 5 years after the 143 date of a prior conviction for a violation of paragraph (4)(a) 144 (3)(a) commits a noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable as a 145 moving violation as provided in chapter 318. 146 (6)(5)âWhen a law enforcement officer issues a citation for 147 a violation of this section, the law enforcement officer must 148 record the race and ethnicity of the violator. All law 149 enforcement agencies must maintain such information and report 150 the information to the department by April 1 annually in a form 151 and manner determined by the department. Beginning July 1, 2023, 152 the department shall annually report the data collected under 153 this subsection to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 154 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The data 155 collected must be reported at least by statewide totals for 156 local law enforcement agencies, state law enforcement agencies, 157 and state university law enforcement agencies. The statewide 158 total for local law enforcement agencies shall combine the data 159 for the county sheriffs and the municipal law enforcement 160 agencies. 161 Section 2.âSection 316.306, Florida Statutes, is amended to 162 read: 163 316.306âPenalties for School and work zones; prohibition on 164 the use of a wireless communications device in a handheld manner 165 on any roadway when construction personnel are present or 166 operating equipment or in a school zone while flashing beacons 167 are activated.â 168 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âwireless 169 communications deviceâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 170 316.305(3)(a). The term includes, but is not limited to, a cell 171 phone, a tablet, a laptop, a two-way messaging device, or an 172 electronic game that is used or capable of being used in a 173 handheld manner. The term does not include a safety, security, 174 or convenience feature built into a motor vehicle which does not 175 require the use of a handheld device. 176 (2)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to: 177 (a)âImprove roadway safety in school and work zones for all 178 vehicle operators, vehicle passengers, bicyclists, pedestrians, 179 and other road users. 180 (b)âPrevent crashes related to the act of driving while 181 using a wireless communications device in a handheld manner when 182 operating a motor vehicle while the vehicle is in motion. 183 (c)âReduce injuries, deaths, property damage, health care 184 costs, health insurance rates, and automobile insurance rates 185 related to motor vehicle crashes. 186 (d)âAuthorize law enforcement officers to stop motor 187 vehicles and issue citations to persons who are driving in 188 school or work zones while using a wireless communications 189 device in a handheld manner as provided in subsection (3). 190 (3)(a)1.âA person may not operate a motor vehicle while 191 using a wireless communications device in a handheld manner in a 192 designated school crossing, school zone, or work zone area as 193 defined in s. 316.003(112). This subparagraph shall only be 194 applicable to work zone areas if construction personnel are 195 present or are operating equipment on the road or immediately 196 adjacent to the work zone area. For the purposes of this 197 paragraph, a motor vehicle that is stationary is not being 198 operated and is not subject to the prohibition in this 199 paragraph. 200 2.âEffective January 1, 2020, a law enforcement officer may 201 stop motor vehicles and issue citations to persons who are 202 driving while using a wireless communications device in a 203 handheld manner in violation of subparagraph 1. 204 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to a motor vehicle 205 operator who is: 206 1.âPerforming official duties as an operator of an 207 authorized emergency vehicle as defined in s. 322.01, a law 208 enforcement or fire service professional, or an emergency 209 medical services professional. 210 2.âReporting an emergency or criminal or suspicious 211 activity to law enforcement authorities. 212 3.âReceiving messages that are: 213 a.âRelated to the operation or navigation of the motor 214 vehicle; 215 b.âSafety-related information, including emergency, 216 traffic, or weather alerts; 217 c.âData used primarily by the motor vehicle; or 218 d.âRadio broadcasts. 219 4.âUsing a device or system in a hands-free manner for 220 navigation purposes. 221 5.âUsing a wireless communications device hands-free or 222 hands-free in voice-operated mode, including, but not limited 223 to, a factory-installed or after-market Bluetooth device. 224 6.âOperating an autonomous vehicle, as defined in s. 225 316.003, in autonomous mode. 226 (c)âA law enforcement officer who stops a motor vehicle for 227 a violation of paragraph (a) must inform the motor vehicle 228 operator of his or her right to decline a search of his or her 229 wireless communications device and may not: 230 1.âAccess the wireless communications device without a 231 warrant. 232 2.âConfiscate the wireless communications device while 233 awaiting issuance of a warrant to access such device. 234 3.âObtain consent from the motor vehicle operator to search 235 his or her wireless communications device through coercion or 236 other improper method. Consent to search a motor vehicle 237 operatorâs wireless communications device must be voluntary and 238 unequivocal. 239 (d)âOnly in the event of a crash resulting in death or 240 serious bodily injury, as defined in s. 316.027, may a userâs 241 billing records for a wireless communications device, or the 242 testimony of or written statements from appropriate authorities 243 receiving such messages, be admissible as evidence in any 244 proceeding to determine whether a violation of subparagraph 245 (a)1. has been committed. 246 (e)âLaw enforcement officers must indicate the type of 247 wireless communications device in the comment section of the 248 uniform traffic citation. 249 (4)(a)âA Any person who violates s. 316.305(4)(a) on any 250 roadway when construction personnel are present or are operating 251 equipment on the road or immediately adjacent to the work zone 252 area, or in a school zone during a period in which the 253 restrictive speed limit is enforced and flashing beacons are 254 activated, this section commits a noncriminal traffic 255 infraction, punishable as a moving violation, as provided in 256 chapter 318, and shall pay a fine of $150 and have 3 points 257 assessed against his or her driver license. A person who commits 258 a second violation shall pay a fine of $250 and have 3 points 259 assessed against his or her driver license. A person who commits 260 a third violation shall pay a fine of $500, have 4 points 261 assessed against his or her driver license, and have his or her 262 driver license suspended for 90 days, and shall have 3 points 263 assessed against his or her driver license as set forth in s. 264 322.27(3)(d)8. 265 (a)âFor a first violation offense under this section, in 266 lieu of the penalty specified in s. 318.18 and the assessment of 267 points, a person who violates this section may elect to 268 participate in a wireless communications device driving safety 269 program approved by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 270 Vehicles. Upon completion of such program, the penalties penalty 271 specified in this section and s. 318.18 and associated costs may 272 be waived by the clerk of the court and the assessment of points 273 must be waived. 274 (b)âThe clerk of the court may dismiss a case and assess 275 court costs in accordance with s. 318.18(12)(a) for a nonmoving 276 traffic infraction for a person who is cited for a first time 277 violation of this section if the person shows the clerk proof of 278 purchase of equipment that enables his or her personal wireless 279 communications device to be used in a hands-free manner. 280 (2)(5)âNotwithstanding s. 318.21, all proceeds collected 281 pursuant to s. 318.18 for violations under of this section must 282 be remitted to the Department of Revenue for deposit into the 283 Emergency Medical Services Trust Fund of the Department of 284 Health. 285 (3)(6)âWhen a law enforcement officer issues a citation for 286 a violation under of this section, the law enforcement officer 287 must: 288 (a)âIndicate in the comment section of the uniform traffic 289 citation the type of wireless communications device that was 290 used to commit the violation. 291 (b)âRecord the race and ethnicity of the violator. All law 292 enforcement agencies must maintain such information and must 293 report such information to the department in a form and manner 294 determined by the department. Beginning February 1, 2020, the 295 department shall annually report the data collected under this 296 paragraph subsection to the Governor, the President of the 297 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The 298 data collected must be reported at least by statewide totals for 299 local law enforcement agencies, state law enforcement agencies, 300 and state university law enforcement agencies. The statewide 301 total for local law enforcement agencies is a combination of 302 must combine the data for the county sheriffs and the municipal 303 law enforcement agencies. 304 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.